Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB227.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 516 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 516. State Convention or Association; Delegates; Expenses; Membership.--The board of school directors or the board of public education of any school district may appoint one or more of its members, its non-member secretary, if any, and its solicitor, if any, as delegates to any State convention or association of school directors, held within the Commonwealth. It shall be the duty of such delegates to attend the meetings of such convention or association, and each delegate so attending shall be reimbursed for travel, travel insurance, lodging, 123456789101112131415161718192021 meals, registration fees and other incidental expenses necessarily incurred. Any such board may become a member of the Pennsylvania School Boards Association, Inc., and may pay, out of the school funds of the district, any membership dues which may be assessed by the association at any State convention of school directors to defray the necessary expenses of maintaining the association and of holding the convention. Such expenses shall be paid by the treasurer of the school district, in the usual manner, out of the school funds of the district, upon the presentation of an itemized, verified statement of such expenses. The Pennsylvania School Boards Association shall be considered a State-affiliated entity under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the "Right-to-Know Law."Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0227PN0173 - 2 - 1234567891011121314